Mississippi statutes. Title 23. Elections
Subarticle B. Other Elections.

§ 23-15-191.
Primary elections.

The first primary shall be held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday of August preceding any regular or general election; and the second primary shall be held three (3) weeks thereafter. The candidate that receives a majority of the votes cast in the election shall be the party nominee. If no candidate receives a majority vote at the election, then the two (2) candidates who receive the highest number of votes shall have their names placed on the ballot for the second primary election to be held three (3) weeks later. The candidate who receives the most votes in the second primary election shall be the party nominee. However, if no candidate receives a majority vote at the first primary, and there is a tie in the election of those receiving the next highest vote, then those candidates receiving the next highest vote and the candidate receiving the highest vote shall have their names placed on the ballot for the second primary election to be held three (3) weeks later, and whoever receives the most votes cast in the second primary election shall be the party nominee.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1942 Code § 3109 [Codes, 1906, § 3700; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6391; 1930, § 5868; Laws, 1914, ch. 149; Laws, 1982, ch. 477, § 1; repealed, Laws, 1970, ch. 506, § 33; repealed by Laws, 1970, ch. 506, § 33, and 1986, ch. 495, § 346]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 50; Laws, 1989, ch. 506, § 1; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 35, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-193.
Officers to be elected at general state election.

At the election in 1995, and every four (4) years thereafter, there shall be elected a Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Secretary of State, Auditor of Public Accounts, State Treasurer, Attorney General, three (3) public service commissioners, three (3) Mississippi Transportation Commissioners, Commissioner of Insurance, Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce, Senators and members of the House of Representatives in the Legislature, district attorneys for the several districts, clerks of the circuit and chancery courts of the several counties, as well as sheriffs, coroners, assessors, surveyors and members of the boards of supervisors, justice court judges and constables, and all other officers to be elected by the people at the general state election. All such officers shall hold their offices for a term of four (4) years, and until their successors are elected and qualified. The state officers shall be elected in the manner prescribed in Section 140 of the Constitution.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-93 [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 7, art. 5 (1); 1857, ch. 4, art. 1; 1871, § 357; 1880, § 118; 1892, § 3633; 1906, § 4140; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6774; 1930, § 6210; 1942, § 3238; Laws, 1970, ch. 506, § 23; Laws, 1978, ch. 458, § 16; Laws, 1982, Ex Sess, ch. 17, § 19; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 51; Laws, 1992, ch. 496, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 1992.

§ 23-15-195.
Elections to be by ballot in one day.

All elections by the people shall be by ballot, and shall be concluded in one (1) day.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-89 [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 7, art 5 (1); 1857, ch. 4, art 1; 1871, § 356; 1880, § 117; 1892, § 3632; 1906, § 4139; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6773; 1930, § 6209; 1942, § 3237; Laws, 1970, ch. 506, § 22; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 52, eff from and after January 1, 1987.

§ 23-15-197.
Times for holding elections.

Times for holding primary and general elections for congressional offices shall be as prescribed in Sections 23-15-1031, 23-15-1033 and 23-15-1041.

Times for holding elections for the office of judge of the Supreme Court shall be as prescribed in Section 23-15-991 and Sections 23-15-974 through 23-15-985, and times for holding elections for the office of judge of the Court of Appeals shall be as prescribed in Section 9-4-5.

Times for holding elections for the office of circuit court judge and the office of chancery court judge shall be as prescribed in Sections 23-15-974 through 23-15-985, and Section 23-15-1015.

Times for holding elections for the office of county election commissioners shall be as prescribed in Section 23-15-213.

Times for holding elections for the office of levee commissioner shall be as prescribed in Chapter 12, Laws of 1928; Chapter 574, Laws of 1968; Chapter 85, Laws of 1930; Chapter 317, Laws of 1983; and Chapter 438, Laws of 2010.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 53; Laws, 1994, ch 564, § 88; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 36, eff from and after July 1, 2017.